Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2505.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Center for African Immigrants and Refugees Organization (CAIRO) to implement the Gateways2Growth Initiative. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Gateways2Growth. new text end new text begin CAIRO may use grant proceeds for the Gateways2Growth Initiative including: new text end new text begin (1) IT workforce training, including (i) expanding access to full-stack development, cybersecurity, and business analysis training programs and (ii) partnering with statewide employers to facilitate hiring and paid internships for IT trainees; new text end new text begin (2) commercial driver's license (CDL) training, including (i) expanding training opportunities for new CDL drivers to address Minnesota's critical shortage in transportation and logistics and (ii) partnering with trucking companies to provide job placements and apprenticeship programs; and new text end new text begin (3) health care workforce development, including (i) training certified nursing assistants, phlebotomists, pharmacy technicians, and other essential health care professionals to meet Minnesota's growing demand in long-term care facilities and hospitals and (ii) collaborating with statewide health care providers to support job placement, credentialing, and licensure. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Allocation. new text end new text begin (a) CAIRO shall distribute grant proceeds equally between workforce programs inside and outside the seven-county Twin Cities metropolitan area. new text end new text begin (b) Priority must be given to (1) individuals from historically underserved communities, including immigrants, refugees, and rural populations; (2) workers seeking reskilling or career transitions due to economic displacement; and (3) underemployed individuals looking to enter high-demand fields with strong career growth potential. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Oversight and reporting requirements. new text end new text begin (a) At the conclusion of each fiscal year, CAIRO, in collaboration with the commissioner of employment and economic development, shall submit a report to the legislature detailing: new text end new text begin (1) the number of participants enrolled in each of the following training sectors: IT, CDL, and health care; new text end new text begin (2) the employment outcomes and wage growth of program graduates; new text end new text begin (3) the regional distribution of participants, ensuring equitable access inside and outside the seven-county Twin Cities metropolitan area; and new text end new text begin (4) recommendations for program expansion and sustainability. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of employment and economic development shall ensure transparency and accountability in the disbursement of money appropriated under this section and program execution. new text end new text begin (c) The report required under paragraph (a) must measure the success of the Gateways2Growth Initiative by detailing the: new text end new text begin (1) total number of program graduates placed into full-time employment; new text end new text begin (2) average wage growth of participants post-training; new text end new text begin (3) retention rates in IT, CDL, and health care professions; and new text end new text begin (4) reduction in workforce shortages for targeted industries. new text end